src/pronPersLexcErz.lexc
LEXICON Tenses1_A_NoReqVow
< 0:А2 0:н %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
< 0:А2 0:т %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:н 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+1Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;
< 0:т 0:А2 0:д 0:о %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+2Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;
!!Removing "0:т 0:У4"  
< %+Pred:0 %+Pres:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;


LEXICON Tenses1_A_ReqVow
< 0:%^ 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:ь %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+1Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:т 0:ь %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+2Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.PL@"> Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:О1 0:л 0:ь %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+3Sg:0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.PL@" > Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:н 0:е 0:к %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+1Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.1@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:О1 0:л 0:и 0:д 0:е %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+2Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.2@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;
< 0:%^ 0:О1 0:л 0:ь 0:т 0:ь %+Pred:0 %+PretII:0 %+3Pl:0 "@U.TPERS.3@" "@D.TNUM.SG@" > Clitics ;




!!!!!
!!

LEXICON Clitics
+CliticGak:^Г1ак  # ;
+NoClitic: # ;

END

"@C.PossPx@"
"@C.LV@"

"@C.TNUM@"
"@C.TPERS@"

"@C.DNUM@"
